Nebraska, session 109, LB226.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB226 LB226
2025 2025
Section 1. (1) For purposes of this section, concealed weapon
offense means:
(a) A violation of section 28-1202 as it existed before September 2,
2023; or
(b) Attempt, conspiracy, solicitation, being an accessory to, aiding
and abetting, aiding the consummation of, or compounding a felony with a
violation described in subdivision (1)(a) of this section as the
underlying offense.
(2) At any time following the completion of sentence or disposition,
a person convicted of a concealed weapon offense or adjudicated in
juvenile court for a concealed weapon offense may file a motion to set
aside such conviction or adjudication. The motion shall be filed in the
county, district, or separate juvenile court in which the movant was
convicted or adjudicated.
(3) In determining whether to set aside the conviction, the court
shall consider:
(a) The behavior of the movant after completion of sentencing or
disposition;
(b) The likelihood that the movant will not engage in further
criminal activity; and
(c) Any other information the court considers relevant.
(4) There shall be a rebuttable presumption that the movant is
entitled to relief under this section if the conduct underlying the
conviction or adjudication for a concealed weapon offense would not be a
violation of section 28-1202 as such section exists at the time the
motion is filed.
(5) The court may grant the motion and issue an order setting aside
the conviction or adjudication when in the opinion of the court the order
will be in the best interest of the movant and consistent with the public
welfare.
(6) An order setting aside a conviction or an adjudication under
-2-

LB226 LB226
2025 2025
this section shall have the same effect as an order setting aside a
conviction as provided in subsections (5) and (6) of section 29-2264.
Sec. 2. Section 29-3523, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
29-3523 (1) After the expiration of the periods described in
subsection (3) of this section or after the granting of a motion under
subsection (4), (5), or (6), or (7) of this section, a criminal justice
agency shall respond to a public inquiry in the same manner as if there
were no criminal history record information and criminal history record
information shall not be disseminated to any person other than a criminal
justice agency, except as provided in subsection (2) of this section or
when the subject of the record:
(a) Is currently the subject of prosecution or correctional control
as the result of a separate arrest;
(b) Is currently an announced candidate for or holder of public
office;
(c) Has made a notarized request for the release of such record to a
specific person; or
(d) Is kept unidentified, and the record is used for purposes of
surveying or summarizing individual or collective law enforcement agency
activity or practices, or the dissemination is requested consisting only
of release of criminal history record information showing (i) dates of
arrests, (ii) reasons for arrests, and (iii) the nature of the
dispositions including, but not limited to, reasons for not prosecuting
the case or cases.
(2) That part of criminal history record information described in
subsection (8) (7) of this section may be disseminated to individuals and
agencies for the express purpose of research, evaluative, or statistical
activities pursuant to an agreement with a criminal justice agency that
specifically authorizes access to the information, limits the use of the
information to research, evaluative, or statistical activities, and
-3-

LB226 LB226
2025 2025
ensures the confidentiality and security of the information.
(3) Except as provided in subsections (1) and (2) of this section,
in the case of an arrest, citation in lieu of arrest, or referral for
prosecution without citation, all criminal history record information
relating to the case shall be removed from the public record as follows:
(a) When no charges are filed as a result of the determination of
the prosecuting attorney, the criminal history record information shall
not be part of the public record after one year from the date of arrest,
citation in lieu of arrest, or referral for prosecution without citation;
(b) When charges are not filed as a result of a completed diversion,
the criminal history record information shall not be part of the public
record after two years from the date of arrest, citation in lieu of
arrest, or referral for prosecution without citation; and
(c) When charges are filed, but the case is dismissed by the court
(i) on motion of the prosecuting attorney, (ii) as a result of a hearing
not the subject of a pending appeal, (iii) after acquittal, (iv) after a
deferred judgment, or (v) after completion of a program prescribed by a
drug court or any other problem solving court approved by the Supreme
Court, the criminal history record information shall not be part of the
public record immediately upon notification of a criminal justice agency
after acquittal pursuant to subdivision (3)(c)(iii) of this section or
after the entry of an order dismissing the case.
(4) Upon the granting of a motion to set aside a conviction or an
adjudication pursuant to section 29-3005, a person who is a victim of sex
trafficking, as defined in section 29-3005, may file a motion with the
same sentencing court for an order to seal the criminal history record
information related to such conviction or adjudication. Upon a finding
that a court issued an order setting aside such conviction or
adjudication pursuant to section 29-3005, the sentencing court shall
grant the motion and:
(a) For a conviction, issue an order as provided in subsection (8)
-4-

LB226 LB226
2025 2025
(7) of this section; or
(b) For an adjudication, issue an order as provided in section
43-2,108.05.
(5) Upon the granting of a motion to set aside a conviction or an
adjudication pursuant to section 1 of this act, the movant may file a
motion with the same court for an order to seal the criminal history
record information related to such conviction or adjudication. Upon a
finding that a court issued an order setting aside such conviction or
adjudication pursuant to section 1 of this act, the court shall grant the
motion and:
(a) For a conviction, issue an order as provided in subsection (8)
of this section; or
(b) For an adjudication, issue an order as provided in section
43-2,108.05.
(6) (5) Any person who has received a pardon may file a motion with
the sentencing court for an order to seal the criminal history record
information and any cases related to such charges or conviction. Upon a
finding that the person received a pardon, the court shall grant the
motion and issue an order as provided in subsection (8) (7) of this
section.
(7) (6) Any person who is subject to a record which resulted in a
case being dismissed prior to January 1, 2017, as described in
subdivision (3)(c) of this section, may file a motion with the court in
which the case was filed to enter an order pursuant to subsection (8) (7)
of this section. Upon a finding that the case was dismissed for any
reason described in subdivision (3)(c) of this section, the court shall
grant the motion and enter an order as provided in subsection (8) (7) of
this section.
(8) (7) Upon acquittal or entry of an order dismissing a case
described in subdivision (3)(c) of this section, or after granting a
motion under subsection (4), (5), or (6), or (7) of this section, the
-5-

LB226 LB226
2025 2025
court shall:
(a) Order that all records, including any information or other data
concerning any proceedings relating to the case, including the arrest,
taking into custody, petition, complaint, indictment, information, trial,
hearing, adjudication, correctional supervision, dismissal, or other
disposition or sentence, are not part of the public record and shall not
be disseminated to persons other than criminal justice agencies, except
as provided in subsection (1) or (2) of this section;
(b) Send notice of the order (i) to the Nebraska Commission on Law
Enforcement and Criminal Justice, (ii) to the Nebraska State Patrol, and
(iii) to law enforcement agencies, county attorneys, and city attorneys
referenced in the court record;
(c) Order all parties notified under subdivision (8)(b) (7)(b) of
this section to seal all records pertaining to the case; and
(d) If the case was transferred from one court to another, send
notice of the order to seal the record to the transferring court.
(9) (8) In any application for employment, bonding, license,
education, or other right or privilege, any appearance as a witness, or
any other public inquiry, a person cannot be questioned with respect to
any offense for which the record is sealed. If an inquiry is made in
violation of this subsection, the person may respond as if the offense
never occurred.
(10) (9) Any person arrested due to the error of a law enforcement
agency may file a petition with the district court for an order to
expunge the criminal history record information related to such error.
The petition shall be filed in the district court of the county in which
the petitioner was arrested. The county attorney shall be named as the
respondent and shall be served with a copy of the petition. The court may
grant the petition and issue an order to expunge such information if the
petitioner shows by clear and convincing evidence that the arrest was due
to error by the arresting law enforcement agency.
-6-

LB226 LB226
2025 2025
(11) (10) The changes made by Laws 2018, LB1132, and this
legislative bill to the relief set forth in this section shall apply to
all persons otherwise eligible in accordance with the provisions of this
section, without regard to the date on which the person was whether
arrested, cited in lieu of arrest, referred for prosecution without
citation, charged, convicted, or adjudicated prior to, on, or subsequent
to July 19, 2018.
Sec. 3. Section 29-3528, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
29-3528 (1) If a state agency or political subdivision or an
Whenever any officer or employee of a the state, its agencies, or its
political subdivisions, or whenever any state agency or any political
subdivision or its agencies fails to comply with the requirements of the
Security, Privacy, and Dissemination of Criminal History Information Act
sections 29-209, 29-210, 29-3501 to 29-3528, and 81-1423 or of rules and
regulations lawfully adopted and promulgated under such act, such failure
creates private liability on the part of such agency, political
subdivision, officer, or employee. Any to implement sections 29-209,
29-210, 29-3501 to 29-3528, and 81-1423, any person aggrieved by such a
violation may bring an action, for appropriate relief including, but not
limited to, actual damages, such preliminary and other equitable or
declaratory relief as may be appropriate, or a writ of an action for
mandamus. ,
(2) Consent is hereby given to join the state, any agency or
political subdivision of the state, and any officer or employee of the
state, its agencies, or its political subdivisions as a defendant in any
action under this section. Such entities, when a party to any such
action, shall be deemed to have waived sovereign immunity and shall be
subject to the judgments, orders, and decrees of the court.
(3) An action under this section is not subject to the State Tort
Claims Act or the Political Subdivisions Tort Claims Act.
-7-

LB226 LB226
2025 2025
(4) An action under this section shall be brought within the later
of the following periods:
(a) Four years after the cause of action accrued; or
(b) By January 1, 2029, if the cause of action accrued on or after
January 1, 2015, and is brought against a state agency or political
subdivision or against an officer or employee of a state agency or
political subdivision only in such officer's or employee's official
capacity.
(5) An to compel compliance and such action under this section may
be brought in the district court of any district in which the records
involved are located or in the district court of Lancaster County. The
commission may request the Attorney General to bring such action.
Sec. 4. Original section 29-3528, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, and section 29-3523, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, are repealed.
-8-